Nevada, session 83, AB598.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The development of state land for a qualified
project or for cottages to provide services related to behavioral
health issues in children by the Campus for Hope Foundation, or its
successor organization, is:
(a) Exempt from the provisions of chapter 341 of NRS and not
subject to the oversight or involvement of the State Public Works
Division of the Department of Administration; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, exempt from
the provisions of chapter 338 of NRS.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. The provisions of NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive, apply
to any contract awarded to a contractor or subcontractor by the
Campus for Hope Foundation, or its successor organization, for the
development of state land for a qualified project in the same manner
as if a public body had awarded the contract.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Development” includes, without limitation, any
construction, improvement, repair, demolition, reconstruction,
acquisition, equipment, operation or maintenance related to the
qualified project or the cottages to provide services related to
behavioral health issues in children by the Campus for Hope
Foundation, or its successor organization.
(b) “Qualified project” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 231.3723.
(c) “State land” means that portion of the real property
commonly known as the Southern Nevada Adult Mental Health
Services Campus which includes Clark County parcel numbers 163-
02-601-007 and 163-02-601-005.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)